Utah statutes.
17-50-326.   Preservation of historical areas and sites.

A county may:

(1)  expend public funds to preserve, protect, or enhance an historical area or site;

(2)  acquire an historical area or site by direct purchase, contract, lease, trade, or gift;

(3)  obtain an easement or right-of-way across public or private property to ensure access or proper development of an historical area or site;

(4)  protect an historical area or site;

(5)  ensure proper development and utilization of land or an area adjacent to an historical area or site; and

(6)  enter into an agreement with a private individual for the right to purchase an historical area or site if and when the private individual elects to sell or dispose of the owner's property.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

